src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
    LEXICON NOUN3_M_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

    +Def:k                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:kow                 Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN3_M_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:o%>                  NullCase/Clitics ;
                                 MascPl ;
    +Def+Gen:ahood               Clitics ; 
    +Indef+Gen:oo´d               Clitics ; 

! TODO: genitives?
LEXICON Arabic/PlOnly_F

    @P.Gender.Fem@      _Arabic_Pl_F ;

    LEXICON _Arabic_Pl_F
    +N+Decl/A+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}        Fem ;
    +N+Decl/A+Fem+Pl+Indef:0                    NullCase ;

    LEXICON Arabic/PlOnly_M
        @P.Gender.Masc@      _Arabic_Pl_M ;

    LEXICON _Arabic_Pl_M
    +N+Decl/A+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}       Masc ;
    +N+Decl/A+Masc+Pl+Indef:0                   NullCase ;

LEXICON NOUN4_M

    @P.Gender.Masc@      _N_4_M_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_4_M_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON NOUN4_FF
        @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_4_F_Sg_PB ;
        @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_4_F_Pl_PB ;

    LEXICON NOUN4_FM
        @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_4_F_Sg_PB ;
        @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_4_M_Pl_PB ;

    LEXICON NOUN4_MF
        @P.Gender.Masc@      _N_4_M_Sg_PB ;
        @P.Gender.Fem@       _N_4_F_Pl_PB ;

    LEXICON _N_4_F_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/4+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}       NOUN4_F_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_4_M_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/4+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}     NOUN4_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_4_F_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/4+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}       NOUN4_F_PostBoundaryPl ;

    LEXICON _N_4_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/4+Masc+Pl:´´%>{N}     NOUN4_M_PostBoundaryPl ;


    LEXICON NOUN4_M_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

    +Def:k                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:kow                 Clitics ;


    LEXICON NOUN4_M_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:a{C2}%>              NullCase/Clitics ;
    +Def:a{C2}                     Masc ;
    ! Pl definite morphemes same as sg.  wanka, wananka


    LEXICON NOUN4_M_Full
    +N+Decl/4+Masc+Sg:´%>{N}       NOUN4_M_Full_PostBoundarySg ;
    +N+Decl/4+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}       NOUN4_M_Full_PostBoundaryPl ;


    LEXICON NOUN4_M_Full_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

    +Def:k                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:kow                 Clitics ;


    LEXICON NOUN4_M_Full_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:{C3A}{C3B}{C3C}%>                NullCase/Clitics ;
    +Def:{C3A}{C3B}{C3C}                   Masc ;
    ! Pl definite morphemes same as sg.  wanka, wananka


    LEXICON NOUN4_F_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

    +Def:t                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:tay                 Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN4_F_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:a{C2}%>              NullCase/Clitics ;
    +Def:a{C2}                    Fem ; 
    ! Pl definite morphemes same as sg.  wanka, wananka


! TODO: genitive?
! ug, dhag supplied
LEXICON NOUN4_UGAX

    @P.Gender.Masc@         _N_4_UGAX_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@          _N_4_UGAX_Pl_PB ;

    LEXICON _N_4_UGAX_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/4+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}     NOUN4_UGAX_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_4_UGAX_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/4+Fem+Pl:´´%>{N}      NOUN4_UGAX_PostBoundaryPl ;

    LEXICON NOUN4_UGAX_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:ax                    NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:axow              Clitics ;

    +Def:ax                      SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:ow                  Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN4_UGAX_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:xan%>              NullCase/Clitics ;
    +Def:xan                    Fem ;

LEXICON NOUN5_M

    @P.Gender.Masc@          _N_5_M_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@           _N_5_F_Sg_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_5_M_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/5+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}      NOUN5_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_5_F_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/5+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN5_M_PostBoundaryPl ;

    LEXICON NOUN5_M_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

    ! buuggayga
    +Def:k                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:kow                 Clitics ;


    ! Tonal plural
    LEXICON NOUN5_M_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:%>                     NullCase/Clitics ;           
    +Def:t       SgProximity ;      

    +Def+Gen:tood´       Clitics ;      
    +Indef+Gen:ood´          Clitics ;      

LEXICON NOUN6_M

    @P.Gender.Masc@          _N_6_M_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@          _N_6_M_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

LEXICON NOUN6_F

    @P.Gender.Fem@           _N_6_F_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@          _N_6_M_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON NOUN6_F/SgOnly
        @P.Gender.Fem@           _N_6_F_Sg_PB ;

    LEXICON _N_6_M_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/6+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}      NOUN6_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_6_F_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/6+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}        NOUN6_F_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_6_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/6+Masc+Pl:´´%>{N}      NOUN6_F_PostBoundaryPl ;


    LEXICON NOUN6_M_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0               NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow          Clitics ;

    +Def:h                 SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:how           Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN6_F_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ay                Clitics ;

    +Def:t                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:tay                 Clitics ;


    LEXICON NOUN6_F_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:oyin                  NullCase/Clitics ;    
    +Def:oyin                    Masc ;

    +Def+Gen:oyinkood´                   Clitics ;


! TODO: some of these should be "retired", need to try to use M_M, M_F, M_MF consistently
LEXICON NOUN7_M

    @P.Gender.Masc@         _N_7_M_g_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@          _N_7_F_Sg_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_g_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:{e}´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg+Voc:%>{N}ow      Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N_7_F_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:{e}´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem ;

LEXICON NOUN7_M/e

    @P.Gender.Masc@  _N_7_M_e_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@   _N_7_M_e_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_e_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:{-e}{e}´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg+Voc:{-e}%>{N}ow      Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_e_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:{-e}{e}´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem ;

LEXICON NOUN7_M_M/e

    @P.Gender.Masc@  _N_7_M_M_e_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@   _N_7_M_M_e_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_M_e_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:{-e}{e}´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg+Voc:{-e}%>{N}ow      Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_M_e_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Pl:{-e}{e}´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Masc ;

LEXICON NOUN7_M_F/e

    @P.Gender.Masc@  _N_7_M_F_e_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@   _N_7_M_F_e_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_F_e_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:{-e}{e}´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg+Voc:{-e}%>{N}ow      Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_F_e_Pl_PB    
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:{-e}{e}´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem ;

! Masc in Sg., Masc or Fem in Pl, lemma ends on -i
LEXICON NOUN7_M_MF/i

    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_7_M_i_MF_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_7_M_i_MF_M_Pl_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@              _N_7_M_i_MF_F_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_i_MF_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_i_MF_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Masc ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_i_MF_F_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem ;



LEXICON NOUN7_M_MF/e

    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_7_M_e_MF_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_7_M_e_MF_M_Pl_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@              _N_7_M_e_MF_F_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;
