src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON D4_M
  bar	NOUN4_M ;
  boos	NOUN4_M ;
  caag	NOUN4_M ;
  cad	NOUN4_M_Full ;
  col	NOUN4_M ;
  dar	NOUN4_M ;
  dhib	NOUN4_M ;
  duub	NOUN4_M ;
  fuq	NOUN4_M ;
  guf	NOUN4_M ;
  jaal	NOUN4_M ;
  kaal	NOUN4_M ;
  leeb	NOUN4_M ;
  miil	NOUN4_M ;
  nis	NOUN4_M ;
  qof	NOUN4_M_Full ;
  raad-guri-cagaar	NOUN4_M ;
  sees	NOUN4_M ;
  taab	NOUN4_M ;
  war	NOUN4_M ;
  xoor	NOUN4_M ;
  yar	NOUN4_M_Full ;
LEXICON D6_F
  adkaysasho:adkaysasha	NOUN6_F ;
  bambo:bamba	NOUN6_F ;
  belaayo:belaaya	NOUN6_F ;
  birmasho:birmasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  bulsho:bulsha	NOUN6_F ;
  caqiido:caqiida	NOUN6_F ;
  cigasho:cigasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  daawadhigasho:daawadhigasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  dawaco:dawaca	NOUN6_F ;
  deggenaasho:deggenaasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  dhawrsasho:dhawrsasha	NOUN6_F ;
  dhuldhaqasho:dhuldhaqasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  dulqaadasho:dulqaadasha	NOUN6_F ;
  fakasho:fakasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  garasho:garasha	NOUN6_F ;
  garawsasho:garawsasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  guurguurasho:guurguurasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  haro:hara	NOUN6_F ;
  hiilgurasho:hiilgurasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  hirqasho:hirqasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  hoyasho:hoyasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  irkasho:irkasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  jago:jaga	NOUN6_F ;
  jahasho:jahasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  karaahiyo:karaahiya	NOUN6_F ;
  kuddayasho:kuddayasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  marnaasho:marnaasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  masiibo:masiiba	NOUN6_F ;
  nuuxnuuxsasho:nuuxnuuxsasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  qabasho:qabasha	NOUN6_F ;
  sasabasho:sasabasha	NOUN6_F ;
  tasho:tasha	NOUN6_F ;
  ubbaahasho:ubbaahasha	NOUN6_F/SgOnly ;
  wado:wada	NOUN6_F ;
LEXICON D7_M
  agaasime	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  ajende:ajend	NOUN7_M ;
  baadari	NOUN7_M_MF/i ;
  baaqe	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  bahaldile	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  baxe:bax	NOUN7_M ;
  bilaale	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  bule	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  caalle	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  caalsaare	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  caawiye:caawiy	NOUN7_M ;
  calanhaye	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  caqlillaawe	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  cune	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  danbibaare:danbibaar	NOUN7_M ;
  deynqabe	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  dhille:dhill	NOUN7_M ;
  dhuudhuule	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  dhuxdhuxle	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  dibkabe	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  diiwaanhaye	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  dumaashi	NOUN7_M_MF/i ;
  faaliye:faaliy	NOUN7_M ;
  farmashiye	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  gafane	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  garoorshe:garoorsh	NOUN7_M ;
  geesi	NOUN7_M_MF/i ;
  geesoole	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  girgire	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  goodile	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  guddoomiye	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  guulwade	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  habdhis-dareen-wade	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  haniye	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  hantiile:hantiil	NOUN7_M ;
  hooseeye	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  ilwalliije	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  indhoole:indhool	NOUN7_M ;
  kaaliye	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  kaalori	NOUN7_M_MF/i ;
  kawaanle	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  kooraggooye	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  kooraqore	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  kulgudbiye	NOUN7_M ;
  kuxige	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  lixledheere	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  macne	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  majaajiliiste:majaajiliist	NOUN7_M ;
  midabside	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  nude	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  qaansoole:qaansool	NOUN7_M ;
  qaboojiye	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  raaciye	NOUN7_M ;
  reyte	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  sagaalle	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  seeddi	NOUN7_M_MF/i ;
  senge	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  shaqayste:shaqayst	NOUN7_M ;
  siiri	NOUN7_M_MF/i ;
  soofiye	NOUN7_M_M/e ;
  tabeeye	NOUN7_M_F/e ;
  tartame:tartam	NOUN7_M ;
  waardiye	NOUN7_M_MF/e ;
  wargeeye:wargeey	NOUN7_M ;
  xiro:xira	NOUN7_M ;
LEXICON ArabicLoans  !!= * @CODE@ 
  burjiwaasi:burjiwaasiyiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  caaqil:caaqiliin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  caroog:caroog	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  faajir:faajiriin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  fujaan:fanaajiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  jaasuus:jaasuusiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  koryeeri:koryeeri	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  madfac:madaafiic	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  maqaasiin:maqaasiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  markab:maraakiib	Arabic/PlOnly_M ;
  masjid:masaajid	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  mu'allif:mu'allifiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  mujarrab:mujarrabiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  musannif:musannifiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  muwaaddin:muwaaddiniin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  raasammaali:raasammaaliyiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  sahyuuni:sahyuuniyiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  sicir:ascaar	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
  surwaal:saraawiil	Arabic/PlOnly_M ;
  waddani:waddaniyiin	Arabic/PlOnly_F ;
